Utah statutes.
58-42a-306.   Supervision requirements.
The supervising occupational therapist shall perform the following functions:
(1)  write or contribute to an individual treatment plan;
(2)  approve and cosign on all modifications to the treatment plan;
(3)  perform an assessment of the patient before referring the patient to a
supervised occupational therapist assistant for treatment;
(4)  meet face to face with the supervised occupational therapist assistant as
often as necessary but at least once every two weeks, to adequately provide
consultation, advice, training, and direction;
(5)  meet with each patient who has been referred to a supervised occupational
therapist assistant at least once each month, unless otherwise approved by the
division in collaboration with the board, to further assess the patient,
evaluate the treatment, and modify the individual's treatment plan;
(6)  limit supervision to not more than two occupational therapist assistants
unless otherwise approved by the division in collaboration with the board; and
(7)  remain responsible for patient treatment provided by the occupational
therapist assistant.
